New Jersey, session 221, A1080.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No individual shall enter into or renew a lease agreement for a dwelling unit without obtaining a renters insurance policy or contract. b.    As used in this act: Dwelling unit means a room or connected rooms within a residential structure forming a self-contained area within that structure and adapted to provide permanent living accommodations for an individual or family, including the availability of heat, electricity, water, and necessary equipment for the culinary and sanitary requirements of a household of the size for which it is intended. Lease agreement means an agreement to transfer possession or control of a dwelling unit for a fixed or indeterminate term for consideration. Renters insurance means an insurance policy or contract that protects an individual leasing a dwelling unit against loss of personal property, liability claims, or additional living expenses incurred from the temporary displacement of the individual from the dwelling unit. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment and shall apply to all lease agreements entered into or renewed on or after that date.